Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Program Act of 1988

§ 69-1-101.
Short title.

Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117 shall be known and cited as the “Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Program Act of 1988.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).

§ 69-1-103.
Creation of “Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Program” and “Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Council”; purpose.

There is hereby created within the Department of Agriculture and Commerce the Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Program, to be administered by the Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Council, hereinafter referred to as “the council,” for the purposes of stimulating the development of new markets for Mississippi Agricultural Products and Industry, and further encouraging the establishment, particularly in the rural areas and smaller communities of Mississippi, of industrial operations processing agricultural products to an end-usage stage, ready for sale to the markets of the nation and the world.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).

§ 69-1-105.
Membership of council; cooperative agreement between agencies represented on council; authority to enter into agreements and contracts; annual report; agricultural marketing director; expenses of council.

The council shall be composed of the Chairman and Vice-chairman, House of Representatives and Senate Agriculture Committees, or their designees, the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Commerce, the Director of the Department of Economic Development, and the Vice-President, Division of Agriculture, Forestry and Veterinary Medicine of Mississippi State University, Alcorn State University, Divisional Director of Agriculture and Applied Sciences, who shall enter into a cooperative agreement to identify resource availability and personnel expertise in all areas directly or indirectly related to agricultural production, management and marketing as may be deemed necessary to achieve the purposes of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117. The cooperative agreement between the agencies shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that Mississippi State University through the Cooperative Extension Service, the Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station, the College of Veterinary Medicine and the Forest Products Labs shall provide technical, educational and direct marketing assistance; basic and applied research, technology transfer, dissemination of research information, interdisciplinary teams, feasibility studies and networking; the Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall be primarily responsible for market development, product promotion, regulatory functions in developing market standards, monitoring standards and establishment of quality control; public relations for Mississippi agriculture, institutional marketing and data collection; the Department of Economic Development shall be primarily responsible for agriculture business and economic development, and financial assistance value added processing. All council member agencies are hereby authorized and directed to utilize and share any and all available resources necessary to accomplish the purposes of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117.

In addition, the council shall be authorized to contract or enter into agreements with other agencies and/or private research centers that it may deem necessary to carry out its duties and functions.

The council shall prepare and submit a comprehensive annual report to the Legislature no later than January 15 of each year.

The council shall appoint an Agricultural Marketing Director, herein called director, who shall be competent and qualified in the area of marketing, agriculture or a related area and receive as compensation for services an annual salary to be established by the personnel board. The director shall be the one-point information contact on agricultural production, management and marketing issues and shall be charged with the duty of knowing the role and responsible personnel in each agency on matters related to agriculture. The director shall be directly responsible to the council for tasks assigned in the administration and implementation of programs developed by the council. The director shall be located in the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and administrative support for the director shall be the shared responsibility of the members of the council.

Any expenses incurred by the council agencies in providing support for the Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry program shall be included pro rata in the annual budget of the respective agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).

§ 69-1-107.
Duties and responsibilities of the council.

The duties and responsibilities of the council shall be the following:

To conduct national and international market research to identify trade and investment opportunities.

To provide one-on-one business assistance with research, strategic planning, partner search, evaluation, negotiation and follow-up.

To identify joint ventures and licensing services.

To provide special assistance to Mississippi’s agricultural producers and firms engaged in the marketing of agricultural products produced in Mississippi to develop markets.

To conduct market studies to identify agricultural products that can be manufactured in Mississippi from materials and resources available in or to Mississippi for which a profitable and growing market exists.

To assist with layout, design, plans and specifications of plants, machinery, equipment and other facilities necessary to products in profitable volume.

To advertise and solicit for production and industrial promotion purposes.

To provide assistance with financial packaging by utilizing all available fund resources provided by the State of Mississippi including, but not limited to, the Small Business Investment Act, Emerging Crop Fund and the Business Financial Investment Act.

To establish a Mississippi Register of Mississippi Agricultural Producers and set criteria for listing therein.

To coordinate purchasing agreements between state institutions and Mississippi agricultural producers.

To create, establish and organize the state into marketing districts for the most effective and efficient use of marketing resources.

To provide any other assistance and services necessary to accomplish the purposes of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).

§ 69-1-109.
Rules and regulations.

The council is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations required to carry out the provisions of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).

§ 69-1-111.
Authorization to accept contributions, gifts and grants; agricultural marketing fund.

The Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Council is hereby authorized and empowered to accept monetary or in-kind contributions, gifts and grants for use in the marketing program. Any such monies shall be deposited in a special fund hereby established in the State Treasury to be known as the “Agricultural Marketing Fund,” to be appropriated by the Legislature for use by the Mississippi Marketing of Agricultural Products and Industry Council.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).

§ 69-1-113.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 15, effective July 1, 2017.

§69-1-113. [Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).]

§ 69-1-115.
Authorization for payment of per diem compensation and actual expenses to council members; exceptions.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation, provided that they shall be entitled to per diem compensation as is authorized by law for each day occupied with the discharge of official duties as members of the council and all actual, necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties, including mileage as authorized by law. However, no member shall be authorized to receive reimbursement for expenses, including mileage, or per diem compensation unless such authorization appears in the minutes of the council and is signed by the chairman or vice chairman. The members of the council shall not receive per diem or expenses while the Legislature is in session. All expenses incurred by and on behalf of the council shall be paid from a sum to be provided in equal portion from the contingency funds of the Senate and House of Representatives.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 8; Laws, 2017, ch. 404, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 69-1-117.
Liberal construction; savings clause.

The provisions of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117 shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117. The powers granted and the duties imposed in Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117 shall be construed to be independent and severable. If any one or more sections, subsections, sentences or parts of any of Sections 69-1-101 through 69-1-117 shall be adjudged unconstitutional or invalid, such adjudication shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remaining provisions thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the specific provisions so held unconstitutional or invalid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 591, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 24, 1988).